Oklahoma, session 2026, SB976.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 491 of Title 19, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The board of county commissioners of a county with a population


greater than five hundred thousand (500,000) according to the latest


Federal Decennial Census, with the approval of the county budget


board, may, by resolution, employ and set the salary of a county


manager. Such county manager shall:


1. Work with the board of county commissioners, other county


officers, and county employees to improve the efficiency of county


government operations;

Req. No. 654 Page 1


2. Oversee a county human resources department;


3. Assist the board of county commissioners and county budget


board with developing and implementing the county budget;


4. Oversee a county information technology department;


5. Serve as an ex officio member of the county budget board;


and


6. Perform other administrative functions delegated to the


county manager by the board of county commissioners or the county


budget board.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1407, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1407. A county budget board is created in each county


which elects to come under the provisions of this act the County


Budget Act. The board shall consist of each elected county officer.


If the county has a county manager, as provided for in Section 1 of


this act, the county manager shall serve as an ex officio member of


the county budget board. The chairman chair of the board of county


commissioners shall serve as chairman chair of the county budget


board. The county clerk shall serve as secretary of the county


budget board. The chairman chair shall have all the rights and


privileges as of any other member of the board, including the right


to vote on questions. Each member of the board shall be entitled to


cast one vote. The members shall elect a vice-chairman vice chair


from among them and develop such other rules or procedures as may be

Req. No. 654 Page 2


necessary to ensure the orderly conduct of business. The vice-


chairman vice chair shall serve as chairman chair during the absence


or vacancy of the chairman chair. When a vacancy occurs in the


office of any county officer serving as a member of the board, such


position on the board shall be considered vacant until the county


office is filled in the manner provided by law. Regular meetings of


the board shall be set by the board. Special meetings shall be held


at the call of the chairman chair or any two (2) members of the


board. A majority of all the members of the board then in office


shall constitute a quorum and have the power to transact business.


Any official action of the board in adopting or revising the county


budget or any portion thereof shall be effective upon the approving


vote of a majority of all the board members then in office.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-654 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:47:02 AM

















Req. No. 654 Page 3